Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 10. Forcible Entry and Detainer

Cross references. —

As to judgment on appeal to district court, see §

1-21-403

.

Provisions permissive, not exclusive. —

This article, providing for summary actions in forcible entry and detainer before justices, is not exclusive, but is permissive, and the landlord may resort thereto or, in proper cases, he may bring ejectment. Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Remedy of re-entry not barred. —

An action brought under this article did not bar an exercise of the remedy of re-entry and the two are not inconsistent. Vissenberg v. Bresnahen, 65 Wyo. 367, 202 P.2d 663,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1949).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Forcible Entry and Detainer §§ 38, 40 to 41, 43 to 50, 52 to 63, 66 to 69.

Landlord and tenant: respective rights in excess rent when landlord relets at higher rent during lessee's term, 50 ALR4th 403.

Commercial leases: application of rule that lease may be canceled only for “material” breach, 54 ALR4th 595.

36A C.J.S. Forcible Entry and Detainer §§ 3 to 109.

§ 1-21-1001.
Jurisdiction
of circuit courts.

Any circuit court within
the judicial district may inquire against those who make unlawful
and forcible entry into lands and tenements and detain the same, or
against those who, having a lawful and peaceable entry into lands
or tenements, unlawfully or by force hold the same. If it is found
that an unlawful and forcible entry was made and the lands or tenements
are held by force, or that after a lawful entry the lands are held
unlawfully, the judge shall require restitution to the complaining
party.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 158; R.S. 1887, § 3574; R.S. 1899, § 4485; C.S. 1910, § 5349; C.S. 1920, § 6621; R.S. 1931, § 62-1701; C.S. 1945, § 14-1501; W.S. 1957, § 1-677; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1001; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice,” “the judicial district” for “his county,” and “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

District court does not have original jurisdiction

in forcible entry and detainer actions. Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Purpose of section. —

This section is primarily intended to give summary restitution of properties unlawfully withheld. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

The principal object of the statutory proceeding is to furnish a speedy remedy for recovery of possession against tenants holding over their term and to save landlords from the need to resort to a cumbersome, dilatory, and expensive suit in ejectment. Knight v. Boner, 459 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1969).

Specific relation between
this section and §

1-21-1002

is not altogether clear insofar
as cases of unlawful detainer are concerned. The last sentence of
§

1-21-1002

has been construed as referring to the provisions of
this section, so it may be that, unless reference is made only to
forcible entry and detainer, this section might embrace cases of unlawful
detainer not mentioned in
§ 1-21-1002.Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Provisions must be complied with. —

A civil proceeding for forcible entry and detainer or unlawful detainer being statutory and summary in nature, statute conferring jurisdiction must be at least substantially complied with in the method of procedure prescribed by it or the jurisdiction will fail to attach and the proceeding will be coram non judice and void. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Complaint essential to jurisdiction. —

In forcible entry and detainer cases, the filing of a complaint describing the property is essential to jurisdiction. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Where justice court was without jurisdiction in an action of forcible entry and detainer because of lack of essential allegations in the complaint, objection of lack of jurisdiction was not waived by failing to raise it in the justice court, nor could an amended complaint filed in the district court cure such jurisdictional defect. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Contents of complaint. —

Under this section, providing for action of unlawful detainer where lawful and peaceable entry has been made, but premises are subsequently unlawfully or forcibly held, the complaint, under §

1-21-1005

, must state the facts showing a lawful and peaceable entry and also the subsequent unlawful or forcible detainer. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Complaint following language of statute sufficient. —

In an action of unlawful detainer, it is sufficient for the complaint to follow the language of the statute. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

And it need not allege that lands were entered upon lawfully.
—

Where petition stated that defendant unlawfully withheld possession of the premises from plaintiffs, it was held not to be necessary to allege, under this section, that the lands were entered upon lawfully, since the manner of entry upon the land would be wholly immaterial in such a case. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Action misdesignated. —

Where an action designated as forcible detainer which was in reality ejectment, which should have been dismissed for want of jurisdiction, was, on defendant's motion, certified to district court, where defendant appeared and successfully resisted plaintiff's motion to remand, court obtained jurisdiction of the persons by reason of such appearance, as the district court had original jurisdiction. Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1892).

Cause of action stated. —

Petition setting out lease and assignment and alleging that defendant was holding over stated a cause of action in forcible entry and detainer. Church v. Blakesley, 39 Wyo. 434, 273 P. 541,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1929).

Prior possession by complainant is not necessary

in unlawful detainer. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Only determination to be made

in the proceeding is “the right or fact of possession.” Knight v. Boner, 459 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1969).

Tenant is estopped to deny title of landlord,

and any investigation of title to the premises is precluded. Knight v. Boner, 459 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1969).

Forcible entry and detainer action does not involve title.

Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Hence, §

1-21-102

not applicable. —

The provisions of §

1-21-102

, requiring a justice of the peace to certify a case to the district court when it appears that title to lands or boundaries came in question before him, do not apply to cases relating to forcible entry and detainer under this section and §

1-21-1002

, since title is not therein involved. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950). See Durante v. Consumers Filling Station Co., 71 Wyo. 271, 257 P.2d 347,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1953).

No jurisdiction to restore premises to mortgage foreclosure
purchaser. —

Justice court held without jurisdiction in forcible entry and detainer action to restore to purchaser at mortgage foreclosure sale premises occupied by debtor after the latter filed petition under section in Bankruptcy Act regarding agricultural compositions and extensions, since it is a proceeding for recovering possession of land. In re Dickinson, 9 F. Supp. 227, 1934 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1197 (D. Wyo. 1934).

Equitable defenses are not available

in cases of unlawful detainer under this section and §

1-21-1002

.Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Neither the court of the justice of the peace nor the action of unlawful detainer is designed to try equitable defenses. Knight v. Boner, 459 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1969).

The possessory action of forcible entry and detainer is not to be converted into an action of ejectment where the question of legal and equitable titles can be tried or to an action seeking equitable relief. That is not to say, of course, that a determination in the possessory action precludes an action in the proper forum to enforce equitable rights. Knight v. Boner, 459 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1969).

A setoff or counterclaim in a detainer action is not permissible.

Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

The efficacy of this section as a summary remedy giving restitution for nonpayment of rent is lessened if not destroyed if a setoff or counterclaim is permitted to be interposed. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

The reason for not allowing setoffs or counterclaims in a detainer action is that since the action is a summary proceeding designed especially for the purpose of a speedy means of recovering possession of real property, tenants withholding the premises in violation of the covenants of their lease cannot through means of a cross-complaint or counterclaim frustrate the extraordinary remedy provided by this section. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Judgment for rent not authorized. —

There is no provision in this section authorizing the justice of the peace to render judgment for rent. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

But no splitting of action occurs when plaintiff sues in another action for rent

due during the period of detainment. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Applied

in

Hill v. Salmon, 69 Wyo. 1, 236 P.2d 518,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1951).

§ 1-21-1002.
When
proceedings allowed.

Proceedings for forcible entry and detainer may be had in any of the following cases:

Against tenants holding over their terms or after a failure to pay rent for three (3) days after it is due;

In sales of real estate on execution, orders or other judicial process, including proceedings for the foreclosure of a mortgage by court action, when the judgment debtor was in possession at the time of rendition of the judgment or decree by virtue of which the sale was made;

When real estate has been sold under a power of sale contained in any mortgage or trust deed and the purchaser or his assignee has demanded possession;

Any sale by executors, administrators, guardians or on partition where any of the parties to the petition were in possession at the commencement of the suit, after the sale has been examined by the proper court and adjudged legal;

In cases where the defendant is a settler or occupier of lands or tenements, without color of title, to which the complainant has the right of possession;

Against renters in violation of any terms imposed under W.S.

1-21-1204

or

1-21-1205

.

This section shall not be construed as limiting the provisions of W.S.

1-21-1201

through

1-21-1210

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 159; R.S. 1887, § 3575; R.S. 1899, § 4486; C.S. 1910, § 5350; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6622; R.S. 1931, § 62-1702; C.S. 1945, § 14-1502; W.S. 1957, § 1-678; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1002; Laws 1999, ch. 198, § 2; 2005, ch. 90, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

deleted “1-21-1101 or” before “1-21-1201 through

1-21-1210

.”

Laws 2005, ch. 90, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

Nature of remedy. —

Forcible entry and detainer is a purely statutory remedy, summary in character and in derogation of the common law. Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

Proceedings under forcible entry and detainer may be had only in cases enumerated

in this section, and if a case is not one of those enumerated, the jurisdiction will fail to attach and the proceeding will be coram non judice and void. Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

Hence, where a seller sought to recover realty from a buyer to whom he had sold the realty under a contract for deed and whom he had put in possession and buyer had defaulted in the terms of the contract, the case was not one of those specific examples set forth in this section, and the justice of the peace had no jurisdiction to bring an action under this section. Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

No question of title. —

In none of the enumerated cases in this section can the title be disturbed or called into question. Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1892).

Forfeiture of lease for nonpayment of rent not provided for.
—

Subsection (a)(i) of this section merely says that failure to pay rent gives a right of summary action for possession; it does not amount to statutory provision for forfeiture of a lease for nonpayment of rent. Durante v. Consumers Filling Station Co., 71 Wyo. 271, 257 P.2d 347,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1953).

And action barred by tender of rent made before action brought.
—

In an action of forcible entry and detainer brought under this section for failure to pay rent for three days, a tender of the rent made before commencement of the action bars the action. Durante v. Consumers Filling Station Co., 71 Wyo. 271, 257 P.2d 347,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1953).

Petition in language of subsection (a)(iii) sufficient. —

A petition in an action of forcible entry and detainer is sufficient where it discloses in the language of subsection (a)(iii) of this section that the real estate involved in the case has been sold under a power of sale contained in a mortgage and further that possession of the premises has been duly demanded. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950); Hill v. Salmon, 69 Wyo. 1, 236 P.2d 518,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1951).

Insufficient complaint. —

An allegation that plaintiff is lessee and entitled to possession of the premises, which are withheld from his possession by defendants without right was insufficient as a complaint. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

No jurisdiction to restore premises to mortgage foreclosure
purchaser. —

Justice court held without jurisdiction in forcible entry and detainer action to restore to purchaser at mortgage foreclosure sale premises occupied by debtor after latter filed petition under section in Bankruptcy Act regarding agricultural compositions and extensions, since it is a proceeding for recovering possession of land. In re Dickinson, 9 F. Supp. 227, 1934 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1197 (D. Wyo. 1934).

Applied

in

Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1923); Church v. Blakesley, 39 Wyo. 434, 273 P. 541,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(1929).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Forcible entry and detainer as a remedy of tenant against stranger wrongfully interfering with his possession, 12 ALR2d 1192.

Right of landowner who has conveyed property to third person to maintain forcible detainer or similar summary possessory action, 47 ALR2d 1170.

Right of landlord legally entitled to possession to dispossess tenant without legal process, 6 ALR3d 177.

§ 1-21-1003.
Notice to quit premises required.

The party desiring to
commence an action for forcible entry or detainer must notify the
adverse party to leave the premises involved. The notice shall be
served at least three (3) days before commencing the action, by leaving
a written copy with the defendant or at his usual place of abode or
business if he cannot be found.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 160; R.S. 1887, § 3576; R.S. 1899, § 4487; C.S. 1910, § 5351; C.S. 1920, § 6623; R.S. 1931, § 62-1703; C.S. 1945, § 14-1503; W.S. 1957, § 1-679; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1003.

Rights under oral lease. —

While landlord was entitled to take possession of premises occupied by defaulting tenant from day to day under oral lease without giving notice, he was without right to take possession of tenant's personal property in the building, and petition alleging these facts stated cause of action for conversion. Day v. Smith, 46 Wyo. 515, 30 P.2d 786,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

Hirsch v. McNeill, 870 P.2d 1057,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Waiver of statutory demand-for-rent due or of notice-to-quit prerequisite of summary eviction of lessee for nonpayment of rent — modern cases, 31 ALR4th 1254.

§ 1-21-1004.
Summons; service and return.

The summons shall state the cause of the complaint against the defendant, the time and place of trial and shall be served and returned as in other cases. Such service shall be not less than three (3) nor more than twelve (12) days before the day of trial set by the judge. The defendant shall not be required to file a written answer to the complaint as a condition of being allowed to participate fully in the trial.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 161; R.S. 1887, § 3577; R.S. 1899, § 4488; C.S. 1910, § 5352; C.S. 1920, § 6624; R.S. 1931, § 62-1704; C.S. 1945, § 14-1504; W.S. 1957, § 1-680; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1004; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2015 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to service and return of summons generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added the last sentence.

§ 1-21-1005.
Proceedings
when defendant fails to appear.

If the defendant does
not appear in accordance with a properly served summons the circuit
court shall try the action as though he were present. Before proceeding,
the plaintiff shall file a complaint in which he relies in order to
recover the premises. The complaint must be sustained by proof or
the action dismissed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 162; R.S. 1887, § 3578; R.S. 1899, § 4489; C.S. 1910, § 5353; C.S. 1920, § 6625; R.S. 1931, § 62-1705; C.S. 1945, § 14-1505; W.S. 1957, § 1-681; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1005; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Necessity of complaint. —

In forcible entry and detainer cases, filing of complaint describing property and facts upon which plaintiff relies in order to recover, as required by this section, is basis of the action, without which the justice is powerless to act. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Petition liberally construed. —

Petition in action of forcible entry and unlawful detainer must be liberally construed. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

Sufficient complaint. —

Petition setting up facts, but containing no allegation of wrongful and unlawful withholding of possession, was sufficient. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

Insufficient complaint. —

A complaint alleging that plaintiff is lessee and entitled to possession of premises in controversy which are withheld from his possession by defendants without right, held insufficient as complaint for forcible entry and detainer. White v. Veitch, 27 Wyo. 401, 197 P. 983,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1921).

Cited

in

Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1892); Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1923); Church v. Blakesley, 39 Wyo. 434, 273 P. 541,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(1929).

§ 1-21-1006.
Proceedings when defendant appears.

The defendant may, but is not required to, file a written answer to the plaintiff’s complaint. Each party may be allowed to amend any complaint or answer the party files.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 163; R.S. 1887, § 3579; R.S. 1899, § 4490; C.S. 1910, § 5354; C.S. 1920, § 6626; R.S. 1931, § 62-1706; C.S. 1945, § 14-1506; W.S. 1957, § 1-682; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1006; 2015 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “If the defendant appears, a like complaint shall be admitted or denied in the answer of the defendant. Both parties may be allowed to amend. If no answer is made by the defendant, he may not offer evidence upon his part, but shall only be allowed to cross-examine the plaintiff's witnesses.”

Cited

in

Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1892).

§ 1-21-1007.
Bond
on granting continuance.

No continuance shall
be granted the defendant for longer than two (2) days unless he gives
a bond to the adverse party, with good and sufficient surety approved
by the circuit court, conditioned for the payment of the rent that
may accrue and costs if judgment is rendered against him.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 164; R.S. 1887, § 3580; R.S. 1899, § 4491; C.S. 1910, § 5355; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 6627; R.S. 1931, § 62-1707; C.S. 1945, § 14-1507; W.S. 1957, § 1-683; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1007; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-1008.
Trial
by judge or jury; judgment and costs.

If the action is not continued, the place of trial changed or if neither party demands a jury, upon the return day of the summons the circuit court shall try the action. If the circuit court concludes that the complaint is not true, the court shall enter judgment against the plaintiff for costs. If the court finds the complaint true, it shall render a general judgment in favor of the plaintiff for restitution of the premises and costs. If the court finds the complaint true in part, it shall render judgment for restitution of that part only and the costs shall be taxed as deemed equitable.

If the case is one based on failure to pay rent, the court shall further find the amount of rent due and payable at the time of the hearing, together with the terms and conditions of the agreement between the parties in relation to the amount and time of payment of rent. If the trial is by jury the verdict shall contain a finding of these facts and the court shall recite such findings in the docket entry of proceedings. The court, upon these findings, in addition to entering judgment for the plaintiff to have restitution, shall render judgment in accordance with the findings for the amount of rent found due, together with costs and attorney’s fees as provided by the lease, and shall issue execution separate from the writ of restitution for the rent found due and costs as in other actions.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 165; R.S. 1887, § 3581; R.S. 1899, § 4492; C.S. 1910, § 5356; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 6628; R.S. 1931, § 62-1708; C.S. 1945, § 14-1508; W.S. 1957, § 1-684; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1008; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2008, ch. 67, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” and “court” for “justice” throughout; and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), substituted “the hearing” for “commencement of the action” in the first sentence, and inserted “and attorney's fees as provided by the lease” in the last sentence.

Provision for judgment for rent only applies if amount is within
justice's jurisdictional limit. —

The provision which requires rendering a judgment for the amount of rent found due only applies when the amount of rent due is within the jurisdictional limitation of the justice of the peace to render judgment therefor. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Although finding may be made as to amount over limitation.
—

If the direction to render a judgment for the amount of rent due is to be construed as mandatory in every case, even when that amount is in excess of the court's constitutional jurisdiction, then the statutory requirement for such a judgment would clearly be unconstitutional and void, but a mere finding of the amount of rent due, even though that amount be in excess of the jurisdictional judgment limitation, would not be constitutionally violative. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Should the amount of rent found due exceed the jurisdictional limitation of the justice of the peace, no judgment for rent would be rendered, but the finding of amount of rent due and the terms of the parties' agreement would be retained, since this insures that a successful plaintiff will receive full monetary protection during pendency of an appeal. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Jurisdictional limit in forcible entry and detainer actions.
—

The $ 7,000.00 monetary jurisdictional limit that is set forth with respect to county courts applies only in those subparagraphs of §

5-5-131

(now see

5-9-128

) articulating jurisdiction in which the legislature specifically reiterated the amount; thus, the county court had jurisdiction in a forcible entry and detainer action in which the amount of rent due exceeded $ 7,000. Jessen v. Burry, 13 P.3d 1118,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-21-1009.
Trial by jury; verdict.

If a jury is demanded
by either party, the proceedings shall be the same as in other cases
until the empaneling thereof. If the jury finds the complaint true
they shall render a general verdict against the defendant, and if
untrue, a general verdict in favor of the defendant. If true in part,
the verdict shall set forth the facts they find true.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 166; R.S. 1887, § 3582; R.S. 1899, § 4493; C.S. 1910, § 5357; C.S. 1920, § 6629; R.S. 1931, § 62-1709; C.S. 1945, § 14-1509; W.S. 1957, § 1-685; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1009.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications, selection and impaneling of jury, see §

1-11-101

et seq.

§ 1-21-1010.
Judgment
upon verdict.

The circuit court shall
enter the verdict upon the docket and render judgment thereon.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 167; R.S. 1887, § 3583; R.S. 1899, § 4494; C.S. 1910, § 5358; C.S. 1920, § 6630; R.S. 1931, § 62-1710; C.S. 1945, § 14-1510; W.S. 1957, § 1-686; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1010; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice,” and “the docket” for “his docket.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-1011.
Exceptions.

Exceptions to the opinion
of the circuit court on questions of law or evidence may be taken
by either party, whether tried by a jury or the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 168; R.S. 1887, § 3584; R.S. 1899, § 4495; C.S. 1910, § 5359; C.S. 1920, § 6631; R.S. 1931, § 62-1711; C.S. 1945, § 14-1511; W.S. 1957, § 1-687; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1011; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-1012.
Writ
of restitution; issuance.

When a judgment of restitution
is entered by a circuit court, the court shall, at the request of
the plaintiff, his agent or attorney, issue a writ of restitution
thereon.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 169; R.S. 1887, § 3585; R.S. 1899, § 4496; C.S. 1910, § 5360; C.S. 1920, § 6632; R.S. 1931, § 62-1712; C.S. 1945, § 14-1512; W.S. 1957, § 1-688; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1012; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice,” and “the court” for “he.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Cited

in

Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 1-21-1013.
Writ of restitution; execution and return.

Unless the defendant
takes an appeal, the officer shall execute the writ of restitution
within two (2) days after receiving it, Sundays excepted, by restoring
the plaintiff to possession of the premises. He shall levy and collect
the execution for rent and costs and make return as upon other executions.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 170; R.S. 1887, § 3586; R.S. 1899, § 4497; C.S. 1910, § 5361; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 6633; R.S. 1931, § 62-1713; C.S. 1945, § 14-1513; W.S. 1957, § 1-689; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1013.

§ 1-21-1014.
Proceedings
upon stay on appeal; bond required.

If the officer receives notice from the circuit court that the proceedings have been stayed on appeal, he shall immediately delay all further proceedings upon execution and writ of restitution. If the premises have been restored to the plaintiff he shall immediately place the defendant in possession thereof and return the writ and execution with his proceedings and costs taxed thereon.

An appeal by a defendant shall not stay the proceedings on judgment unless within forty-eight (48) hours after judgment, Sundays excepted, the appellant executes and files with the court his bond to plaintiff, with two (2) or more sufficient sureties approved by the court, conditioned that the appellant will pay all costs which have accrued or may thereafter accrue and all damages which plaintiff may have sustained or may thereafter sustain in consequence of the wrongful detention of the premises during the pendency of the appeal. Upon taking the appeal and filing the bond, all further proceedings in the case shall be stayed and the appellate court shall thereafter issue all writs and processes to carry out the judgment of the appellate court. The court in which the appeal is pending may require a new bond in a larger amount, with sureties approved by the appellate court, if deemed necessary to secure the rights of the parties.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 171; R.S. 1887, § 3587; R.S. 1899, § 4498; C.S. 1910, § 5362; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 6634; R.S. 1931, § 62-1714; C.S. 1945, § 14-1514; W.S. 1957, § 1-690; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1014; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “circuit court” for “justice”; and in (b) twice substituted “court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Stated

in

Kost v. Thatch, 782 P.2d 230,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Circumstances in which indefinite stay of proceedings in federal civil case constitutes abuse of discretion or is otherwise unlawful, 150 ALR Fed 577.

§ 1-21-1015.
Rents
to be deposited on appeal.

In appeals from the judgment of a circuit court for rents due and payable, in addition to the bond required by W.S.

1-21-1014

, the appellant shall deposit with the court the amount of rent specified in the judgment. Unless the deposit is made, the appeal is not perfected and proceedings upon the judgment shall be had accordingly. If the appeal is perfected, the court shall transmit the deposit to the clerk of the appellate court with the papers in the case.

Thereafter, when the rents become due, the appellant shall deposit them with the clerk of the appellate court. If at any time during the pendency of the appeal and before final judgment the appellant fails to make any deposit of rent at the time specified in the judgment appealed, the court in which such appeal is pending shall, upon such fact being made to appear, and upon motion and proof of such fact by the appellee, the appellate court shall affirm the judgment appealed from with costs. Proceedings shall thereupon be had as in like cases determined upon the merits and the rent money deposited paid to the plaintiff or his assignee upon order of the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, § 173; R.S. 1887, § 3589; R.S. 1899, § 4497; C.S. 1910, § 5363; Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 6635; R.S. 1931, § 62-1715; C.S. 1945, § 14-1515; W.S. 1957, § 1-691; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1015; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “circuit court” for “justice,” and twice substituted “court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Full rental value for entire period assured if successful on
appeal. —

Even though by appeal the party decreed restitution may be deprived of possession until final judgment, if ultimately successful, such a party is assured of receiving the full rental value found for the entire period during which possession will have been unlawfully withheld. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Steffens v. Smith, 477 P.2d 119,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 1-21-1016.
Ejectment not barred.

The pendency of an action
for forcible entry or detainer does not bar an action of ejectment.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 112, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 6636; R.S. 1931, § 62-1716; C.S. 1945, § 14-1516; W.S. 1957, § 1-692; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-1016.

Cross references. —

As to actions of ejectment, see §§

1-32-201

to

1-32-216

.

Cited

in

Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1892); Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1923).

§ 1-21-1017.
Corporate and business representation in proceedings.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to subsection (c) of this section, a business entity may represent itself without an attorney in any proceedings under this article that the business entity commences or is required to respond to or participate in, provided that:

The business entity is represented by an owner, shareholder, member or partner;

The business entity owns a majority interest in the lands or tenements subject to the alleged unlawful and forcible entry;

The person representing the business entity may litigate actions on behalf of the business entity without an attorney, provided that if an attorney appears on behalf of the business entity, the opposing party is entitled to a continuance for the purpose of obtaining an attorney of its own; and

The business entity provides notice in writing to the court and all parties to the proceedings that it is being represented by an owner, shareholder, member or partner. The notice shall be signed by every owner, shareholder, member or partner of the business entity.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule, any person who represents a business entity in an action or proceeding under this article in accordance with the provisions of this section shall not be deemed to have engaged in the unauthorized practice of law, provided that the person complies with the provisions of W.S.

33-5-117

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any business entity that is seeking a judgment exceeding the amount specified in W.S.

1-21-201

in any action under this article.

History.

2021 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 143, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.